District of Columbia statutes.
47-2611

Exemption of nonprofit relief associations.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall apply to any relief association, not conducted for profit, composed solely of officers and enlisted men of the United States Army, Navy, or Air Force, or solely of employees of any other branch of the United States government service or solely of employees of the District of Columbia government, or solely of employees of any individual, company, firm, or corporation or to any fraternal organization which issues contracts of insurance exclusively to its own members.

History

Aug. 17, 1937, 50 Stat. 676, ch. 690, title II, § 8
renumbered as § 11, Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-113, § 401, 31 DCR 3974
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Cross References

Personal property, disposition when unclaimed, “life insurance corporation” defined, see § 41-102.
Auctioneers, licensing, applicable law, see § 47-2808.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 41-102.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2611.
1973 Ed., § 47-1808.

Editor's Notes

Mayor authorized to issue rules: See notes to § 47-2601.